Idaho statutes. Title 28 COMMERCIAL TRANSACTIONS
Part 4
Money of Account and Interest

§ 28-42-401. Money of account defined.

The money of account in this state is the dollar, cent and mill, and all public accounts and the proceedings of all courts in relation to money must be kept and expressed in money of the above denomination.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-42-401, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.

§ 28-42-402. Money of other denominations.

The above provisions do not in any manner affect any demand expressed in money of another denomination, but such demand in any suit or proceeding affecting the same must be reduced to the above denominations.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-42-402, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.

§ 28-42-403. Computation of judgments.

In all judgments rendered by any court for any debt, damages or costs, and in all executions issued thereon, the amount must be computed, as near as may be, in dollars and cents, rejecting small fractions; and no judgment or other proceeding is erroneous for such omission.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-42-403, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.

§ 28-42-404. Compound interest.

Parties may agree in writing for the payment of compound interest.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-42-404, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.